Colorado, session 2026A, SB116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-1-104.6, amend
(2)(a), (3)(a), (5)(c), (6)(a), (8)(a), (8)(b)(I), (8)(c), and (8)(d) as follows:
39-1-104.6. Qualified-senior primary residence real property -
valuation for assessment - reimbursement to local governments for
reduced valuation - temporary mechanism for refunding excess state
revenues - legislative declaration - definitions.
(2) Classification.
(a) For property tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2025,
BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, residential real property that as of the
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

assessment date is used as the primary residence of an owner-occupier is
classified as qualified-senior primary residence real property, which is a
subclass of residential real property, if:
(3) Applications.
(a) For a property to be classified as qualified-senior primary
residence real property, an individual must file with the assessor a
completed application no later than July 15 of the first property tax year for
which the classification is sought, THROUGH JULY 15, 2026. An application
returned by mail is deemed filed on the date it is postmarked.
(5) Confidentiality.
(c) In accordance with section 25-2-103 (4.7), the administrator
shall annually provide to the state registrar of vital statistics of the
department of public health and environment a list, by name and social
security number, of every individual who had property classified as
qualified-senior primary residence real property for the immediately
preceding year so that the registrar can provide to the administrator a list of
all the individuals on the list who have died. No later than April 1, 2026,
and April 1 of each year thereafter NO LATER THAN APRIL 1, 2027, the
administrator shall forward to the assessor of each county the name and
social security number of each deceased individual who had residential real
property located within the county that was so classified for the immediately
preceding year so that the assessor can change the classification of the
property, if necessary.
(6) Notice.
(a) As soon as practicable after January 1, 2025, and after January
1 of each year thereafter JANUARY 1, 2026, each county treasurer shall, at
the treasurer's discretion, mail or electronically send to each person whose
name appears on the tax list and warrant as an owner of residential real
property notice of the qualified-senior primary residence real property
classification. The treasurer shall mail or electronically send the notice each
year on or before the date on which the treasurer mails the property tax
statement for the previous property tax year pursuant to section 39-10-103.
The administrator shall prescribe the form of the notice, which must include
a statement of the eligibility criteria for the primary residence real property
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-116

and qualified-senior primary residence real property classifications and
instructions for obtaining a related application.
(8) Reporting to administrator.
(a) No later than September 10, 2025, and September 10 of each
year thereafter NO LATER THAN SEPTEMBER 10, 2026, each assessor shall
forward to the administrator a report on the residential real property in the
assessor's county that qualifies for classification as qualified-senior primary
residence real property for the current property tax year. For each unit of
residential real property, the report must include:
(b) (I) The administrator shall examine the reports sent by each
assessor pursuant to subsection (8)(a) of this section to ensure that no
applicant has applied for a qualified-senior primary residence real property
classification without meeting all legal requirements for obtaining the
classification. No later than November 1, 2025, and November 1 of each
year thereafter NO LATER THAN NOVEMBER 1, 2026, if the administrator
determines that an applicant has applied for more than one property to be
classified as qualified-senior primary residence real property, the
administrator shall provide written notice to the applicant that the applicant
has applied for more than one such classification and is therefore not
entitled to the classification for any property. If the administrator determines
that the applicant and the applicant's spouse have applied for separate
properties to be classified as qualified-senior primary residence real
property, that the classification was applied for in violation of subsection
(4) of this section, that the applicant has claimed the classification for
residential real property that the applicant does not own and occupy as the
applicant's primary residence as required by subsection (2)(a) of this
section, or that the applicant is otherwise ineligible for the classification, the
administrator shall provide written notice to an applicant that the applicant
is ineligible and the reason for the ineligibility. The notice must also include
a statement specifying the deadline and procedures for protesting the denial
of the classification or classifications claimed.
(c) No later than December 1, 2025, and each December 1 thereafter
NO LATER THAN DECEMBER 1, 2026, and after examining the reports sent by
each assessor, denying applications for classification of property as
qualified-senior primary residence real property, and deciding protests in
accordance with subsection (8)(b) of this section, the administrator shall
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-116

provide written notice to the assessor of each county in which an application
has been denied because the applicant was ineligible that includes the
identity of each denied applicant and the reason for each denial.
(d) No later than January 10, 2026, and each January 10 thereafter
NO LATER THAN JANUARY 10, 2027, each assessor shall forward to the
administrator a partial copy of the tax warrant for the assessor's county that
includes only property for which the assessor has granted an application for
classification as qualified-senior primary residence real property. The
administrator shall examine the tax warrants to ensure that no additional
classifications of property as qualified-senior primary residence real
property have been allowed since the administrator examined the reports
previously received from the assessors and that each assessor has removed
from the tax warrant all such classifications that the administrator
previously denied. No later than January 17, 2026, and no later than each
January 17 thereafter JANUARY 17, 2027, the administrator shall notify each
assessor and each treasurer of any such classifications to be removed from
the tax warrant.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-3-119.5, amend
(2)(a)(VII), (2)(a)(VIII), (2)(b)(I)(A), (2)(b)(I)(B), (2)(b)(I)(C), (3)(b),
(3)(c)(I), (3)(c)(II), (3)(d), (3)(e), and (3)(g); and add (2)(a)(IX), (2)(b)(III),
and (3)(e.5) as follows:
39-3-119.5. Personal property - exemption - reimbursement to
local governments - legislative declaration - definitions.
(2) (a) The exemption created in subsection (1) of this section shall
be up to and including the following amounts:
(VII) Seven thousand seven hundred dollars for property tax years
commencing on January 1, 2019, and January 1, 2020; and
(VIII) Fifty thousand dollars for property tax years commencing on
January 1, 2021, and January 1, 2022; AND
(IX) FIFTY-EIGHT THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR PROPERTY TAX YEARS
COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027.
(b) (I) (A) Beginning with the property tax year commencing on
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-116

January 1, 2023, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, the amount of the
exemption created in subsection (1) of this section shall be adjusted
biennially to account for inflation since the amount of the exemption last
changed pursuant to this subsection (2). On or before November 1, 2022,
and each even-numbered year thereafter BUT BEFORE 2027, the
administrator shall calculate the amount of the exemption for the next
two-year cycle using inflation for the prior two calendar years as of the date
of the calculation. The adjusted exemption shall be rounded upward to the
nearest one hundred dollar increment. The administrator shall certify the
amount of the exemption for the next two-year cycle and publish the
amount on the website maintained by the division of property taxation in the
department of local affairs.
(B) When calculating the exemption amount under subsection
(2)(b)(I)(A) of this section, the administrator shall do another calculation in
the same manner but starting from seven thousand nine hundred dollars
instead of fifty FIFTY-EIGHT thousand dollars. This amount is the alternative
exemption amount.
(C) If, under subsection (3)(f) of this section, the state treasurer
notifies the administrator that not all counties have received reimbursement
warrants for lost property tax revenue for the amounts specified in
subsection (3)(d) of this section, then beginning with the property tax year
commencing on January 1 that follows the notification, and for all property
tax years thereafter BUT BEFORE PROPERTY TAX YEAR 2027, the amount of
the exemption in subsection (1) of this section is the alternative exemption
amount. Thereafter, BUT BEFORE PROPERTY TAX YEAR 2027, the alternative
exemption is adjusted biennially to account for inflation in the same manner
as set forth in subsection (2)(b)(I)(A) of this section, and the administrator
shall certify the amount of the exemption for the next two-year cycle and
publish the amount on the website maintained by the division of property
taxation in the department of local affairs.
(III) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(b) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2028.
(3) (b) No later than February 1, 2022, and each February 1
thereafter THROUGH FEBRUARY 1, 2027, the administrator shall calculate the
percentage increase or decrease in total valuation of business personal
property in the state over the prior two property tax years. The administrator
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-116

shall publish the percentage increase or decrease on the website maintained
by the division of property taxation in the department of local affairs.
(c) (I) For the property tax years commencing on OR AFTER January
1, 2022, and each year thereafter BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, each
assessor shall calculate an estimate of the aggregate value of exempt
business personal property for the county and each local governmental
entity located within the county that is equal to the applicable baseline
exemption total adjusted by the growth factor for each property tax year
commencing on and after January 1, 2022 BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027.
(II) For the property tax years commencing on OR AFTER January 1,
2022, and each year thereafter BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, each treasurer
shall calculate the total property tax revenues lost by all local governmental
entities within the treasurer's county based on the estimate of exempt
business personal property amount calculated in accordance with subsection
(3)(c)(I) of this section.
(d) No later than March 1, 2022, and each March 1 thereafter
THROUGH MARCH 1, 2027, each treasurer shall report the amount specified
in subsection (3)(a)(II) or (3)(c)(II) of this section, as applicable, and the
basis for the amount to the administrator, and the administrator may require
a treasurer to provide additional information as necessary to evaluate the
amount reported. The administrator shall confirm that the reported amount
is correct or rectify the amount, if necessary. The administrator shall then
forward the correct amount for each county to the state treasurer to enable
the state treasurer to issue a reimbursement warrant to each treasurer in
accordance with subsection (3)(e) of this section.
(e) No later than April 15, 2022, and April 15 of each year thereafter
THROUGH APRIL 15, 2027, the state treasurer shall issue a warrant to be paid
upon demand from the general fund to each treasurer that is equal to the
amount specified by the administrator for the county under subsection (3)(d)
of this section. Each treasurer shall distribute the total amount received
from the state treasurer to the local governmental entities within the
treasurer's county as if the revenues had been regularly paid as property tax.
When distributing the money, the treasurer shall provide each local
governmental entity with a statement of the amount distributed to the local
governmental entity that represents the reimbursement received under this
subsection (3)(e).
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-116

(e.5) NO LATER THAN APRIL 15, 2028, AND APRIL 15 OF EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL ISSUE A WARRANT TO BE PAID
UPON DEMAND FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO EACH TREASURER THAT IS
EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT SPECIFIED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE COUNTY
UNDER SUBSECTION (3)(d) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE 2026 PROPERTY TAX
YEAR. EACH TREASURER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE TOTAL AMOUNT RECEIVED
FROM THE STATE TREASURER TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES
WITHIN THE TREASURER'S COUNTY AS IF THE REVENUES HAD BEEN
REGULARLY PAID AS PROPERTY TAX. WHEN DISTRIBUTING THE MONEY, THE
TREASURER SHALL PROVIDE EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY WITH A
STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT DISTRIBUTED TO THE LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITY THAT REPRESENTS THE REIMBURSEMENT RECEIVED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(e.5).
(g) (I) This subsection (3) does not apply if the amount of the
exemption created in subsection (1) of this section is the alternative
exemption amount as required by subsection (2)(b)(I)(C) of this section.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (3)(g) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2028.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-116

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-116